Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.040

Budget—Four-year budget plan—Notice of completion—Copies—Review by educational service districts.

(1) On or before the tenth day of July in each year, all school districts shall prepare their budget for the ensuing fiscal year. The annual budget development process shall include the development or update of a four-year budget plan that includes a four-year enrollment projection. The four-year budget plan must include an estimate of funding necessary to maintain the continuing costs of program and service levels and any existing supplemental contract obligations.

(2) The completed budget must include a summary of the four-year budget plan and set forth the complete financial plan of the district for the ensuing fiscal year.

(3)(a) Upon completion of their budgets, every school district shall electronically publish a notice stating that the district has completed the budget, posted it electronically, placed it on file in the school district administration office, and that a copy of the budget and a summary of the four-year budget plan will be furnished to any person who calls upon the district for it.

(b) School districts shall submit one copy of their proposed budget and the four-year budget plan summary to their educational service districts for review and comment by July 10th. The superintendent of public instruction may delay the dates in this section if the state's operating budget is not finally approved by the legislature until after June 1st.

(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider the information provided under (b) of this subsection when ranking each school district by the financial health of the school district in order to provide information for districts to avoid potential financial difficulty, insolvency, or binding conditions.

[ 2019 c 208 s 3; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 604; 1995 c 121 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.65.415.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 604, 605, and 606: "Sections 604, 605, and 606 of this act take effect January 1, 2018." [ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 608.]

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—1995 c 121: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 20, 1995]." [ 1995 c 121 s 3.]

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.